Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 9. PUBLIC SECURITIES

SUBTITLE D. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SECURITIES ISSUED BY COUNTIES

CHAPTER 1302. DESTRUCTION OF COUNTY SECURITY

Sec. 1302.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "county security" means a certificate, bond, interest coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a county.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1302.002. AUTHORIZATION. The commissioners court of a county may contract with the county's depository or another entity that acts as the registrar or paying agent for a county security issued by the county for the destruction of a county security that has been issued and paid by the county.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1302.003. LIMITATION. A contract under Section 1302.002 may not authorize the destruction of a county security before:

(1) the first anniversary of the date the county security is paid; or

(2) the end of the third month after the date the depository, registrar, or paying agent files a list identifying the county security to be destroyed with the commissioners court or county treasurer.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.